Ohio, session 136, HB407.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5534.928 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 5534.928. In addition to any other name prescribed i n 6
the Revised Code or otherwise, the northbound and southbound 7
lanes of United States route number sixty-eight, between United 8
States route number twenty-two and state route number seven 9
hundred thirty, in the municipal corporation of Wilmington, in 10
Clinton county, shall be known as the "Daniel Smith Memorial 11
Highway." 12
The director of transportation may erect suitable markers 13
along the highway indicating its name. 14